North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 6. Acquisitions.

§ 146-22.
All acquisitions to be made by Department of Administration.

Every acquisition of land on behalf of the State or any State agency, whether by purchase, condemnation, lease, or rental, shall be made by the Department of Administration and approved by the Governor and Council of State.

If the proposed acquisition is a purchase or gift of land with an appraised value of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), and the acquisition is for other than a transportation purpose, the acquisition may only be made after written notice to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, to the board of commissioners and the county manager, if any, of the county in which the land is located, and to the governing body and the city manager, if any, of the municipality in which the land is located if the land is located within a municipality. The notice shall be given to the chairs of the Commission and of the county and municipal governing boards at least 30 days prior to the acquisition, and the chairs shall forward a copy of the notice to the members of their respective bodies within three days of their receipt of the notice. The board of commissioners, individual commissioners, the governing body of the municipality, and individual members of that body may provide written comments on the acquisition to the Department of Administration; the Department shall forward the comments to the Governor and the Council of State.In determining whether the appraised value is at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), the value of the property in fee simple shall be used.The State may not purchase land as a tenant-in-common without consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations if the appraised value of the property in fee simple is at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

Acquisitions on behalf of the University of North Carolina Health Care System shall be made in accordance with

G.S. 116-37(i)

, acquisitions on behalf of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill shall be made in accordance with G.S. 116-37(a)(4), acquisitions on behalf of the clinical patient care programs of the School of Medicine of The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill shall be made in accordance with G.S. 116-37(a)(4), and acquisitions on behalf of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan of the East Carolina University School of Medicine shall be made in accordance with G.S. 116-40.6(d).

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 6; G.S., s. 146-103; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1116, s. 97; 1998-212, s. 11.8(d); 2005-39, s. 1; 2007-322, s. 11; 2007-396, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to the exception of acquisitions of an interest in real property by lease pursuant to

G.S. 116-31.12

from the provisions of Article 36 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and Article 6 of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, see

G.S. 116-31.12

.

§ 146-22.1.
Acquisition of property.

In order to carry out the duties of the Department of Administration as set forth in Chapters 143 and 146 of the General Statutes, the Department of Administration is authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, gift, condemnation or otherwise:

Lands necessary for the construction and operation of State buildings and other governmental facilities.

Lands necessary for construction and operation of parking facilities.

An area in the City of Raleigh bounded by Edenton Street, Person Street, Peace Street, the right-of-way of the main line of Seaboard Coast Line Railway and North McDowell Street for the expansion of State governmental facilities, the public interest in, public use of, and the necessity for the acquisition of said area, being hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

Lands necessary for the location, expansion, operation and improvement of hospital and mental health facilities and similar institutions maintained by the State of North Carolina.

Lands necessary for public parks and forestry purposes.

Lands involving historical sites, together with such adjacent lands as may be necessary for their preservation, maintenance and operation.

Lands necessary for the location, expansion and improvement of any educational, penal or correctional institution.

Lands necessary to provide public access to the waters within the State.

Lands necessary for agricultural, experimental and research facilities.

Utility and access easement, rights-of-way, estates for terms of years or fee simple title to lands necessary or convenient to the operation of state-owned facilities.

Lands necessary for the development and preservation of the estuarine areas of the State.

Lands necessary for the development of waterways within the State.

Lands necessary for acquisition of all or part of an area of environmental concern, as requested pursuant to

G.S. 113A-123

.

Lands necessary for the construction of hazardous waste facilities as defined in

G.S. 130A-290

, inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal sites as defined in

G.S. 130A-310

, Superfund sites as described in

G.S. 130A-310.22

, and lands necessary for the construction of low-level radioactive waste facilities as defined in

G.S. 104E-5

.

History.

1969, c. 1091, s. 1; 1973, c. 1284, s. 2; 1981, c. 704, s. 23; 1989, c. 286, s. 11.

§ 146-22.2.
Appraisal of property to be acquired by State.

Except as otherwise provided in G.S. 136-19.6, where an appraisal of real estate or an interest in real estate is required by law to be made before acquisition of the property by the State or an agency of the State, the appraisal shall be made by a real estate appraiser licensed or certified by the State under Article 5 of Chapter 93A of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 34.5(b).

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 827, s. 12; 1991, c. 94, s. 1; 1993, c. 519, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 691, s. 1; 1995, c. 135, s. 1; 2017-57, s. 34.5(b).

§ 146-22.3.
Acquisition of land to be used to restore, enhance, preserve, or create wetlands.

Payment. — A State agency that acquires land by purchase for the purpose of restoring, enhancing, preserving, or creating wetlands as required by a permit or an authorization issued by the United States Army Corps of Engineers under 33 U.S.C. § 1344 must pay to the county in which the land is located, as reimbursement, a sum equal to the estimated amount of ad valorem taxes that would have accrued to the county for the next 20 years had the land not been acquired by the State agency.

Exception. — This section does not apply when the land purchased by the State agency and the wetlands permitted to be lost are located in the same county. In other circumstances, the governing body of the county and the State agency may enter into a written agreement to waive payment.

Amount. — The estimated amount of ad valorem taxes that would have accrued for the next 20 years is the total assessed value of the acquired land excluded from the county’s tax base multiplied by the tax rate set by the county board of commissioners in its most recent budget ordinance adopted under Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, and then multiplied by 20.

Application. — This section applies only to land acquired in counties designated as a development tier one area under G.S. 143B-437.08.

History.

2004-188, s. 4; 2006-252, s. 2.14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-252, s. 2.14, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “a development tier one area under G.S. 143B-437.08” for “an enterprise tier one or enterprise tier two area under G.S. 105-129.3” in subsection (d).

§ 146-22.4.
Acquisition of wetlands from private mitigation banking companies.

Payment for Taxes. — A State agency that acquires wetlands from a private mitigation banking company must pay a sum in lieu of ad valorem taxes to the county where the wetlands are located. The sum is equal to the estimated amount of ad valorem taxes that would have accrued for the next 20 years as computed in

G.S. 146-22.3(c)

.

Requirement for Acquisition. — A State agency may require, as a condition of accepting a donation of wetlands by a private mitigation banking company, that the company make adequate provisions for the long-term maintenance and management of the wetlands. These provisions may include reimbursement to the agency for payment of a sum in lieu of ad valorem taxes.

Application. — This section applies only to land acquired in counties designated as a development tier one area under G.S. 143B-437.08.

History.

2004-188, s. 5; 2006-252, s. 2.15.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-252, s. 2.15, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “a development tier one area under G.S. 143B-437.08” for “an enterprise tier one or enterprise tier two area under G.S. 105-129.3” in subsection (c).

§ 146-22.5.
Reimbursement of payment in lieu of future ad valorem taxes.

If a State agency acquires land under

G.S. 146-22.3

or

G.S. 146-22.4

and later uses this land to mitigate wetlands permitted to be lost in the same county, then the county shall reimburse the State agency. The reimbursement shall equal the estimated amount of ad valorem taxes paid for the land in accordance with

G.S. 146-22.3

minus ten percent (10%) of this amount multiplied by the number of years the State agency held the land before the wetlands were lost.

Application. — This section applies only to land acquired in counties designated as a development tier one area under G.S. 143B-437.08.

History.

2004-188, s. 6; 2005-435, s. 44; 2006-252, s. 2.16.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-435, s. 44, effective September 27, 2005, substituted “agency. The reimbursement shall equal” for “agency for a percentage of” and “multiplied by” for “times” in the first and second sentences of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2006-252, s. 2.16, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “a development tier one area under G.S. 143B-437.08” for “an enterprise tier one or enterprise tier two area under G.S. 105-129.3” in subsection (b).

§ 146-23.
Agency must file statement of needs; Department must investigate.

Any State agency desiring to acquire land, whether by purchase, condemnation, lease, or rental, shall file with the Department of Administration an application setting forth its needs, and shall furnish such additional information as the Department may request relating thereto. Upon receipt of such application, the Department of Administration shall promptly investigate all aspects of the requested acquisition, including the existence of actual need for the requested property on the part of the requesting agency; the availability of land already owned by the State or by any State agency which might meet the requirements of the requesting agency; the availability, value, and status of title of other land, whether for purchase, condemnation, lease, or rental, which might meet the requirements of the requesting agency; and the availability of funds to pay for land if purchased, condemned, leased, or rented. In investigating the availability of land already owned by the State or by any State agency which might meet the requirements of the requesting agency, the Department of Administration shall review the utilization information maintained in the real property inventories pursuant to

G.S. 143-341(4)

. The Department of Administration may make acquisitions at the request of the Governor and Council of State upon compliance with the investigation herein required.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 6; G.S., s. 146-104; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1969, c. 1091, s. 2; 2016-119, s. 3(a).

§ 146-23.1.
Buildings having historic, architectural or cultural significance.

In order to promote the use of buildings having historic, architectural or cultural significance, the Department of Administration shall inform the North Carolina Historical Commission of all geographical areas in the State within which the State is actively seeking to lease space for the accommodation of State agencies. Within 60 days of the receipt of such information, the North Carolina Historical Commission shall identify for the Department of Administration all buildings within such geographical areas that (i) are known to be of historic, architectural or cultural significance (including but not limited to buildings listed or eligible to be listed on the National Register established pursuant to 16 U.S.C. 470(a)), and (ii) which may be suitable, whether or not in need of repair, alteration or addition, for acquisition or lease to meet the public building and space needs of State agencies. In addition, the North Carolina Historical Commission shall furnish the Department of Administration such additional information on the physical condition, usable space, and the nature and approximate costs of necessary historic rehabilitation as the department may request in order for the department to determine whether the acquisition or lease of space in such buildings is feasible and prudent.

In acquiring lease space pursuant to

G.S. 146-25.1

, the Department of Administration shall give preference to lease proposals involving buildings identified by the North Carolina Historical Commission as having historic, architectural or cultural significance. Provided, however, that such preference shall be given only when the Department of Administration, after investigation as provided in this Article, determines that such proposal is feasible, prudent and in the best interest of the State, as compared with available alternatives, such determination to include the State’s policy to preserve historic buildings.

History.

1977, c. 998, s. 1.

§ 146-23.2.
Purchase of buildings constructed or renovated to a certain energy-efficiency standard.

A State agency shall not acquire by purchase any building unless the building was designed and constructed to at least the same standards for energy efficiency and water use that the design and construction of a comparable State building was required to meet at the time the building under consideration for purchase was constructed. Further, a State agency shall not acquire by purchase any building that had a major renovation unless the major renovation of the building was designed and constructed to at least the same standards for energy efficiency and water use that the design and construction of a major renovation of a comparable State building was required to meet at the time the building under consideration for purchase was renovated.

This section does not apply to the purchase of a building having historic, architectural, or cultural significance under Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes. This section does not apply to buildings that are acquired by devise or gift.

History.

2008-203, s. 3.

§ 146-24.
Procedure for purchase or condemnation.

If, after investigation, the Department determines that it is in the best interest of the State that land be acquired, the Department shall proceed to negotiate with the owners of the desired land for its purchase.

If the purchase price and other terms are agreed upon, the Department shall then submit to the Governor and Council of State the proposed purchase, together with a copy of the deed, for their approval or disapproval. If the Governor and Council of State approve the proposed purchase, the Department shall pay for the land and accept delivery of a deed thereto. All conveyances of purchased real property shall be made to “the State of North Carolina,” and no such conveyance shall be made to a particular agency, or to the State for the use or benefit of a particular agency.

If negotiations for the purchase of the land are unsuccessful, or if the State cannot obtain a good and sufficient title thereto by purchase from the owners, then the Department of Administration may request permission of the Governor and Council of State to exercise the right of eminent domain and acquire any such land by condemnation in the same manner as is provided for the Board of Transportation by Article 9 of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes. Upon approval by the Governor and Council of State, the Department may proceed to exercise the right of eminent domain. Approval by no other State agency shall be required as a prerequisite to the exercise of the power of eminent domain by the Department. Provided that when the procedures of Article 9 of Chapter 136 are employed by the Department, any person named in or served with a complaint and declaration of taking shall have 120 days from the date of service thereof within which to file answer.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 6; G.S., s. 146-105; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1967, c. 512, s. 1; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1981, c. 245, s. 1.

§ 146-24.1.
The power of eminent domain.

In carrying out the duties and purposes set forth in Chapters 143 and 146 of the General Statutes, the Department of Administration is vested with the power of eminent domain and shall have the right and power to acquire such lands, easements, rights-of-way or estates for years by condemnation in the manner prescribed by

G.S. 146-24

of the General Statutes. The power of eminent domain herein granted is supplemental to and in addition to the power of eminent domain which may be now or hereafter vested in any State agency as defined by

G.S. 146-64

and the Department of Administration may exercise on behalf of such agency the power vested in said agency or the power vested in the Department of Administration herein; and the Department of Administration may follow the procedure set forth in

G.S. 146-24

or the procedure of such agency, at the option of the Department of Administration. Where such acquisition is made at the request of an agency, such agency shall make a determination of the necessity therefor; where such acquisition is on behalf of the State or at the request of the Department of Administration, such findings shall be made by the Director of Administration. Provided, however, that all such acquisitions shall have the approval of the Governor and Council of State as provided in G.S. 146-24.

This section shall not apply to public projects and condemnations for which specific statutory condemnation authority and procedures are otherwise provided.

History.

1969, c. 1091, ss. 3, 4.

§ 146-25.
Leases and rentals.

General Procedure. — If, after investigation, the Department of Administration determines that it is in the best interest of the State that land be leased or rented for the use of the State or of any State agency, the Department shall proceed to negotiate with the owners for the lease or rental of such property. All lease and rental agreements entered into by the Department shall be promptly submitted to the Governor and Council of State for approval or disapproval.

Leases Exceeding 30-Year Terms. — The Department of Administration shall not enter into a lease of real property for a period of more than 30 years, or a renewal of a lease of real property if the renewal would make the total term of the lease exceed 30 years, unless specifically authorized to do so by the General Assembly. The Department of Administration shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations at least 30 days prior to entering or renewing such a lease and shall include a copy of the legislation authorizing the lease or lease renewal in the report. This subsection shall not apply to leases by a university endowment to a university.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 6; G.S., s. 146-106; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 2016-94, s. 37.7(a).

§ 146-25.1.
Proposals to be secured for leases.

If pursuant to

G.S. 146-25

, the Department of Administration determines that it is in the best interest of the State to lease or rent land and the rental is estimated to exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000) per year or the term will exceed three years, the Department shall require the State agency desiring to rent land to prepare and submit for its approval a set of specifications for its needs. Upon approval of specifications, the Department shall prepare a public advertisement. The State agency shall place such advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the county for proposals from prospective lessors of said land and shall make such other distribution thereof as the Department directs. The advertisement shall be run for at least five consecutive days, and shall provide that proposals shall be received for at least seven days from the date of the last advertisement in the State Property Office of the Department. The provisions of this section do not apply to property owned by governmental agencies and leased to other governmental agencies.

The Department may negotiate with the prospective lessors for leasing of the needed land, taking into account not only the rental offered, but the type of land, the location, its suitability for the purposes, services offered by the lessor, and all other relevant factors. In the event either no proposal or no acceptable proposal is received after advertising in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the Department may negotiate in the open market for leasing of the needed land.

The Department of Administration shall present the proposed transaction to the Council of State for its consideration as provided by this Article. In the event the lowest rental proposed is not presented to the Council of State, that body may require a statement of justification, and may examine all proposals.

History.

1973, c. 1448; 1975, c. 523; 1977, c. 485; 1979, c. 43, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1116, s. 97; 1999-252, s. 1; 2019-241, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-241, s. 12, effective November 6, 2019, substituted “forty thousand dollars ($40,000)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

§ 146-26.
Donations and devises to State.

No devise or donation of land or any interest therein to the State or to any State agency shall be effective to vest title to the land or any interest therein in the State or in any State agency until the devise or donation is accepted by the Governor and Council of State. If the land is devised or donated to the State or to any State agency as an historic property, then title shall not vest until the Historical Commission reports to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division as provided in

G.S. 121-9

. Upon acceptance by the Governor and Council of State, title to the said land or interest therein shall immediately vest as of the time title would have vested but for the above requirement of reporting to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division if an historic property and acceptance by the Governor and Council of State.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 6; G.S., s. 146-107; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.7(b); 2017-57, s. 14.1(cc).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 14.1(cc), effective July 1, 2017, substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division” for “Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations” in two places.

§ 146-26.1.
Relocation assistance.

In the acquisition of any real property by the Department of Administration for a public use, the Department of Administration shall be vested with the authority as set forth in Article 2 of Chapter 133 of the General Statutes.

History.

1971, c. 540; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 34; 1993, c. 553, s. 52.1.